Maine, session 132, LD466.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3109, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 244, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Repeal. This section is repealed September 1, 2025 October 1, 2027.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2282(03)